Nebraska, session 109, LB945.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB945 LB945
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 68-2106, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
68-2106 (1) The Hospital Quality Assurance and Access Assessment
Fund is created. Interest earned on the fund shall be credited to the
fund. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The department shall use the Hospital Quality Assurance and
Access Assessment Fund, including the matching federal financial
participation, for the purpose of enhancing rates paid to hospitals under
the medical assistance program except as allowed by subsection (3) of
this section. Money in the fund shall not be used to replace or offset
existing state funds paid to hospitals for providing services under the
medical assistance program.
(3) The Hospital Quality Assurance and Access Assessment Fund shall
also be used to:
(a) Reimburse the General Fund the amount of the first quarterly
payment on or before June 30 of each fiscal year;
(b) Reimburse the department an administrative fee of three percent
of the assessment, not to exceed fifteen million dollars per year, to
collect assessments and administer directed-payment programs established
by the Hospital Quality Assurance and Access Assessment Act;
(c) Provide the Nebraska Center for Nursing Board one-half of one
percent of the assessment, not to exceed two million five hundred
thousand dollars per year, for the expansion of clinical nursing training
sites as authorized in subsection (3) of section 71-1798; and
(d) Provide funding of three and one-half percent of the assessment,
not to exceed seventeen million five hundred thousand dollars per year,
for rates for nonhospital providers in the medical assistance program,
continuous eligibility for children, and or the designated health
information exchange authorized in section 81-6,125.
-2-

LB945 LB945
2026 2026
(4) In calculating rates, the proceeds from assessments and federal
match not utilized under subsection (3) of this section shall be used to
enhance rates for hospital inpatient and outpatient services in addition
to any funds appropriated by the Legislature.
(5) The department shall collect data for revenue, discharge, and
inpatient days from a hospital that does not file an annual medicare cost
report. At the request of the department, a hospital that does not file
an annual medicare cost report shall submit such requested data to the
department.
(6) The department shall prohibit a medicaid managed care
organization from (a) setting, establishing, or negotiating reimbursement
rates with a hospital in a manner that takes into account, directly or
indirectly, a directed payment that a hospital receives under the
Hospital Quality Assurance and Access Assessment Act, (b) unnecessarily
delaying a directed payment to a hospital, or (c) recouping or offsetting
a directed payment for any reason.
(7)(a) A hospital shall not:
(i) Set, establish, or negotiate reimbursement rates with a managed
care organization in a manner that directly or indirectly takes into
account a directed payment that a hospital receives under the Hospital
Quality Assurance and Access Assessment Act; or
(ii) Directly pass on the cost of an assessment to patients or
nonmedicaid payors, including as a fee or rate increase.
(b) A hospital that violates this subsection shall not receive a
directed payment for the remainder of the rate year. This subsection
shall not be construed to prohibit a hospital from negotiating with a
payor for a rate increase.
Sec. 2. Original section 68-2106, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-3-